Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 2. Gas and Oil Conservation.
§ 45.2-1624.
Release of funds held in escrow or suspense because of conflicting claims to coalbed methane gas.

For a coalbed methane gas well that was force-pooled prior to July 1, 2015, the coalbed methane gas well operator shall, on or before January 1, 2016, apply to the Board for the release of the funds in escrow and give written notice of such application to every conflicting claimant identified in the pooling orders, or to the successor of such claimant where the successor is known to the coalbed methane gas well operator or has identified himself to the coalbed methane gas well operator or the Board. Such notice shall be in accordance with the applicable provisions of §

45.2-1618

and, if any unknown person or unlocatable conflicting claimant is subject to escrow, such notice shall also be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties where the drilling unit is located once each week for four successive weeks. The application shall include a detailed accounting in accordance with subdivision B 5 of §

45.2-1622

. The Board shall order payment of the principal and accrued interest, less escrow account fees, held in escrow, along with all future royalties attributable to the drilling unit, to each gas claimant identified in the pooling order unless, within 45 days of the coalbed methane gas well operator’s notice of its application, the coal claimant provides the Board and the coalbed methane gas well operator with evidence of a proceeding or agreement. The Board, pursuant to its authority granted by §

45.2-1614

, may extend the time for filing the application and delay the payment of funds for a gas title conflict, the existence of an unknown gas claimant, the existence of an unlocatable gas claimant, an unresolved gas heirship issue, or any other reason beyond the reasonable control of the coalbed methane gas well operator and shall not order payment if the gas claimant fails to provide the Board with information needed under applicable law or regulation to distribute the funds.

For a coalbed methane gas well force-pooled on or after July 1, 2015, the Board, in its pooling order, shall direct the coalbed methane gas well operator to pay royalties to the gas claimant unless the coal claimant provides the coalbed methane gas well operator and the Board with evidence of a proceeding or agreement not later than the time and place of the pooling hearing. The coalbed methane gas well operator shall provide written notice of the hearing to every gas claimant and coal claimant in accordance with §

45.2-1618

. However, the Board, pursuant to its authority granted by §

45.2-1614

, shall not order the coalbed methane gas well operator to make payment to a gas claimant if there exists any gas title conflict, unknown gas claimant, unlocatable gas claimant, unresolved gas heirship issue, or other reason beyond the reasonable control of the coalbed methane gas well operator or if the gas claimant fails to provide the coalbed methane gas well operator with the information required under applicable law or regulation to pay royalties. If the Board so declines to order payment to be made to a gas claimant, the coalbed methane gas well operator shall provide each affected gas claimant and the Board with written notice of the reason payment is not required to be made in accordance with the applicable provisions of §

45.2-1618

. If payment is not required to be made due to the gas claimant’s failure to provide needed information under applicable law or regulation, the notice shall identify the information that is needed to enable the payment to be made.

For a coalbed methane gas well voluntarily pooled at any time, the coalbed methane gas well operator shall pay royalties, including past royalties held, to each gas claimant unless, within 45 days of the coalbed methane gas well operator’s provision of written notice to the coal claimant that the operator will be paying royalties to the gas claimants, the coal claimant provides the coalbed methane gas well operator and each gas claimant with evidence of a proceeding or agreement. For any unit voluntarily pooled before July 1, 2015, the coalbed methane gas well operator shall provide such written notice to each gas claimant and coal claimant on or before January 1, 2016. For any unit voluntarily pooled on or after July 1, 2015, the coalbed methane gas well operator shall provide such written notice to each gas claimant and coal claimant not later than 45 days after production commences. However, the coalbed methane gas well operator shall not be required to make payment to a gas claimant if there exists any gas title conflict, unknown gas claimant, unlocatable gas claimant, unresolved gas heirship issue, or other reason beyond the reasonable control of the coalbed methane gas well operator or if the gas claimant fails to provide the coalbed methane gas well operator with information to process or pay royalties. If the Board so declines to order payment to be made to a gas claimant, the coalbed methane gas well operator shall provide each affected gas claimant with written notice of the reason payment is not required to be made in accordance with the applicable provisions of §

45.2-1618

. If payment is not required to be made due to a gas claimant’s failure to provide needed information, the notice shall identify the information that is needed to enable the payment to be made.

Any pending judicial or arbitration proceeding shall be pursued by the coal claimant with diligence and shall not be voluntarily dismissed or nonsuited without the consent of the gas claimant. No default judgment shall be entered against a gas claimant in such proceeding. Royalties shall be paid as determined by the final order in the proceeding. A prevailing gas claimant may recover from the nonprevailing coal claimant reasonable costs and attorney fees if such gas claimant substantially prevails on the merits of the case and the coal claimant’s position is not substantially justified.

A coalbed methane gas well operator paying funds to a gas claimant in accordance with this section shall have no liability to a coal claimant for the payments made by the coalbed methane gas well operator to a gas claimant.

This section shall not operate to extinguish any other right or cause of action or defense thereto, including any claim for an accounting or claim under §

8.01-31

. Nothing in this section shall create, confer, or impose a fiduciary duty.

History.

2015, c. 396, § 45.1-361.22:2; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1625.
Appeals of the Director’s decisions; notices; hearings and orders.

With the exception of an aggrieved permit applicant, no person shall have standing to appeal a decision of the Director to the Board concerning a new permit application unless such person has previously filed an objection with the Director pursuant to the provisions of §

45.2-1637

.

When a person applies for a hearing to appeal a decision of the Director to the Board, the Board shall, at least 20 days prior to the hearing, give notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the person making the appeal and, if different, to the gas or oil operator subject to the appeal.

Upon submittal of the petition for appeal of a decision of the Director to the Board, the Director shall forward to the Board (i) the permit application or order and associated documents; (ii) all required notices; and (iii) the written objections, proposals, and claims recorded during the informal fact-finding hearing.

In any appeal involving a permit for a new well that was objected to (i) pursuant to the provisions of §

45.2-1611

or

45.2-1612

or (ii) by a gas storage field operator who asserts that the proposed well work will adversely affect the operation of a gas storage field certificated by the State Corporation Commission, the filing of a petition for appeal shall stay any permit until the case is decided by the Board or the stay is dissolved by a court of record. However, in an appeal by a gas storage field operator, such automatic stay shall not apply to any oil, gas, or coalbed methane well completed more than 100 feet above the cap rock above the storage stratum. In any other appeal, the Director may order the permit or other decision stayed for good cause shown until the case is decided by the Board or the stay is dissolved by a court of record. An appeal based on an alleged risk of danger to any person not engaged in the gas or oil operations shall be prima facie proof of good cause for a stay.

The Board shall conduct all hearings under this section in accordance with the formal litigated issues hearing provisions of Article 3 (§

2.2-4018

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act. However, any person to whom notice is required to be given pursuant to subsection B shall have standing to be heard at the hearing. The Board shall render its decision on such appeals within 30 days of the hearing’s closing date and shall provide notification of its decision to all parties pursuant to the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

History.

1990, c. 92, § 45.1-361.23; 1997, c. 759; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1626.
Enforcement.

The Director shall enforce the provisions of this article pursuant to the provisions of Article 3 (§

45.2-1629

et seq.). In addition, if any person violates or threatens to violate any provision of this article, regulation adopted thereunder, or order of the Board, the Board may maintain suit to restrain any such violation or threatened violation.

History.

1982, c. 347, § 45.1-306; 1990, c. 92, § 45.1-361.24; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1627.
Standing when Director or Board fails to act.

If the Director or Board fails to take enforcement action within 10 days of the Board’s receipt of a petition alleging that the petitioner is or will be adversely affected by a violation or threatened violation of any provision of this article, regulation adopted thereunder, or order of the Board, the petitioner shall have standing to file a complaint in the appropriate circuit court. The Board, in addition to the person violating or threatening to violate the provision of this article, regulation adopted thereunder, or order of the Board, shall be made a party to any such action.

History.

1982, c. 347, § 45.1-307; 1990, c. 92; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1628.
Recording of orders.

The Inspector shall cause a true copy of any order entered by the Board that establishes a drilling unit or pools any interests to be recorded in the office of the clerk of the circuit court of each locality wherein any portion of the relevant drilling unit is located. Such order shall be recorded in the record book in which gas or oil leases are normally recorded. The sole charge for recordation shall be a tax equal to $10 plus $1 per page of the order. From the time noted on the recordation by the clerk, the recordation shall be notice of the order to all persons.

History.

1982, c. 347, § 45.1-308; 1990, c. 92, § 45.1-361.25; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.